Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.05
Examining board; meetings; notice.

Notice of all meetings, including the annual meeting of the examining board, shall be in such manner as provided in the bylaws of the examining board.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 7.